Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1392.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2357.304, as


last amended by Section 3, Chapter 402, O.S.L. 2025 (68 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 2357.304), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2357.304. A. Except as provided in subsection D of


this section, for tax years 2009 through 2031, a qualified employee


shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to


Section 2355 of this title of up to Five Thousand Dollars


($5,000.00) per tax year, for tax years 2009 through 2026, and Ten


Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per tax year, for tax years 2027


through 2031, for a period of time not to exceed five (5) years



Req. No. 2458 Page 1


during the lifetime of the qualified employee. This credit may be


claimed in nonconsecutive tax years.


B. The credit authorized by this section shall not be used to


reduce the tax liability of the taxpayer to less than zero (0).


C. Any credit claimed, but not used, may be carried over, in


order, to each of the five (5) subsequent taxable years.


D. No credit otherwise authorized by the provisions of this


section may be claimed for any event, transaction, investment,


expenditure, or other act occurring on or after July 1, 2010, for


which the credit would otherwise be allowable. The provisions of


this subsection shall cease to be operative on July 1, 2011.


Beginning July 1, 2011, the credit authorized by this section may be


claimed for any event, transaction, investment, expenditure, or


other act occurring on or after July 1, 2011, according to the


provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2458 QD 12/30/2025 10:35:15 PM













Req. No. 2458 Page 2